Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB682.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The act of March 10, 1949 (P.L.30, No.14), known as the Public School Code of 1949, is amended by adding a section to read:Section 743. Air Conditioning in Student-Occupied Areas.--(a) By the beginning of the 2028-2029 school year, a school entity shall complete installation of functioning air conditioning in each student-occupied area.(b) A school entity that is unable to comply with subsection (a) shall submit a plan not later than August 1, 2028, to the department explaining the action the school entity will take to comply with subsection (a) as soon as possible.(c) (1) A school entity that has not yet installed air 1234567891011121314151617181920 conditioning in each student-occupied area by the deadline established under subsection (a) shall develop and implement a student-occupied area temperature control plan.(2) A student-occupied area temperature control plan must include:(i) Procedures to maintain student-occupied area temperatures between 72 degrees and 79 degrees Fahrenheit during months in which a heating system is not needed in the student-occupied areas, to the maximum extent practicable.(ii) Procedures for closing a student-occupied area when the temperature inside the student-occupied area is above 88 degrees Fahrenheit.(3) A school entity shall update and resubmit its student-occupied area temperature control plan to the department annually by a date established by the department until air conditioning is installed in each student-occupied area of the school entity.(d) As used in this section, the following words and phrases shall have the meanings given to them in this subsection unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Department." The Department of Education of the Commonwealth."School entity." A school district, intermediate unit, area career and technical school, charter school or regional charter school."Student-occupied area." An indoor area in which students congregate for educational purposes, including a classroom, cafeteria, gymnasium and library.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB0682PN0696 - 2 - 1234567891011121314151617181920212223242526272829